South Dakota, session 2026, HB1235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 1-54:
At least once each calendar year, the officers and employees of each state agency
shall complete a training provided by an individual selected by the governments of each
Indian tribe. The training must include:
(1) The legal status of each Indian tribe;
(2) The legal rights of the members of each Indian tribe; and
(3) Any social, economic, and cultural issues of concern to each Indian tribe.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 1-54:
At least once each year, the Governor, the heads of each state agency, and tribal
officials from each Indian tribe, shall meet to discuss:
(1) Tribal concerns with the administrative rules and agency policies that directly
impact tribal government or tribal populations;
(2) Other issues of concern to either the state or the tribes; and
(3) Potential solutions to the concerns raised in subdivision (1) or (2).
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 1-54:
On or before August fifteenth of each year, a state agency shall report to the
Governor, detailing the activities of the state agency relating to tribal governments or
tribal populations for the previous fiscal year. The report must include:
(1) Any administrative rule or agency policy change that the agency has adopted
because of the meeting held pursuant to section 2 of this Act;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.945.9 2 1235
(2) The process that the state agency has established to identify activities of the state
agency that relate to tribal governments or tribal populations;
(3) The efforts made by the state agency to promote communication with tribal
governments and the government-to-government relationship between the state
agency and each tribe; and
(4) The efforts made by the state agency to ensure tribal consultation and the use of
American Indian data in the development and implementation of agency programs
that directly relate to tribal governments or tribal populations.
On or before September fifteenth of each year, the Governor shall provide to each
tribal government a report detailing all state activities, as they relate to tribal governments
or tribal populations, for the prior fiscal year.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.